Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1558
Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund to be known as the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Fund. The proceeds of the fee imposed by sections 81-1559 to 81-1560.02, money received by the department as gifts, donations, or contributions toward the goals stated in section 81-1535, and money received by the department for nonprofit activities concerning litter reduction and recycling, including, but not limited to, honoraria, literature furnished by the department, and funds realized as reimbursement for expenses in conducting educational forums, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to such fund to be used for the administration and enforcement of the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 25;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 11;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 113;

Laws 1999, LB 592, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 52;

Laws 2020, LB858, § 19;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 41;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 198.
September 30, 2030
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.